Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
Article 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For note, “Postjudgment Garnishment in Georgia: Acting Largely in the Dark,” see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 60 (1977).

For note discussing postjudgment garnishment as a creditor’s remedy, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 814 (1978).

18-4-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Disposable earnings” means that part of the earnings of an individual remaining after the deduction for federal income tax, state income tax, withholdings for the Federal Insurance Contributions Act (FICA), and other mandatory deductions required by law.

“Earnings” means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, fee, bonus, tips, overtime, or severance pay, including recurring periodic payments from pensions or retirement plans, including, but not limited to, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, Railroad Retirement Board, Keoghs, and individual retirement accounts.

“Entity” means a public corporation or a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, professional corporation, firm, or other business organization other than a natural person.

“Financial institution” means every federal or state chartered commercial or savings bank, including savings and loan associations and cooperative banks, federal or state chartered credit unions, benefit associations, insurance companies, safe-deposit companies, trust companies, any money market mutual fund, or other organization held out to the public as a place of deposit of funds or medium of savings or collective investment.

“Garnishee answer” or “garnishee’s answer” means the response filed by a garnishee responding to a summons of garnishment detailing the money or other property of the defendant that is in the possession of the garnishee or declaring that the garnishee holds no such money or other property of the defendant.

“Public corporation” means any department, agency, branch of government, or political subdivision, as such term is defined in Code Section 50-15-1, or any public board, bureau, commission, or authority created by the General Assembly.

“Statutory overnight delivery” shall have the same meaning as defined in Code Section 9-10-12.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 1/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added paragraph (7).

U.S. Code.

The federal Insurance Contributions Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

26 U.S.C. § 3101

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on labor and employment law, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 137 (2021).

18-4-2.
Uniform procedures for garnishment; entitlement to procedures; application of the Civil Practice Act; amendment.

The procedure in garnishment cases shall be uniform in all courts throughout this state that have jurisdiction to preside over garnishment proceedings.

In all cases when a money judgment was obtained in a court of this state or a federal court or is being enforced in this state as provided in Article 5 of Chapter 12 of Title 9, the “Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act,” or Article 6 of Chapter 12 of Title 9, the “Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Law,” the plaintiff shall be entitled to the process of garnishment.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Chapter 11 of Title 9 shall apply in garnishment proceedings in the state courts and superior courts of this state.

Any affidavit, garnishee answer, or pleading required or permitted by this chapter shall be amendable at any time before judgment is entered or before money or other property subject to garnishment is distributed by the court; however, no person or entity not named as garnishee in the original affidavit of garnishment filed in an action may be added as a garnishee by any amendment in such action absent a showing that any such amendment is done to correct or clarify the identity of an originally named garnishee.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 2/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “in the state courts and superior courts of this state” at the end of subsection (c) and added “; however, no person or entity not named as garnishee in the original affidavit of garnishment filed in an action may be added as a garnishee by any amendment in such action absent a showing that any such amendment is done to correct or clarify the identity of an originally named garnishee” at the end of subsection (d).

18-4-3.
Affidavit and requirements; summons of garnishment.

The plaintiff, the plaintiff’s attorney, or the plaintiff’s agent shall make, on personal knowledge or belief, an affidavit setting forth that the plaintiff has a judgment against a named defendant, the amount remaining due on the judgment, the name of the court which rendered the judgment, and the case number thereof.

Upon the filing of the affidavit described in subsection (a) of this Code section with the clerk of any court having jurisdiction to preside over garnishment proceedings, such clerk shall cause a summons of garnishment to issue, provided that the plaintiff’s affidavit is made before any officer authorized to administer oaths, a notary public, such clerk, or the deputy clerk of the court in which the garnishment is filed.

An affidavit of garnishment may be electronically submitted to the clerk or deputy clerk of the court if the court has promulgated rules authorizing such submission.

The form for an affidavit of garnishment is set forth in Code Section 18-4-71.

The amount remaining due on a judgment may include, at the election of the plaintiff, any and all unrecovered filing and service fees paid to a court of this state, or to any sheriff, marshal, constable, or other such person authorized by law to serve process, for previous garnishment actions based on such judgment.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2018, p. 820, § 1/SB 194; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 3/SB 443.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “Upon the filing of the affidavit described in subsection (a) of this Code section with the clerk of any court having jurisdiction to preside over garnishment proceedings, such clerk shall cause a summons of garnishment to issue, provided that the plaintiff’s affidavit is:

“(1) Made before any officer authorized to administer oaths, a notary public, such clerk, or the deputy clerk of the court in which the garnishment is filed; and

“(2) Submitted to and approved by any judge of the court in which the garnishment is filed or submitted to and approved by any clerk or deputy clerk of such court if the court has promulgated rules authorizing the clerk or deputy clerk of such court to review and approve affidavits of garnishment.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added subsection (e).

Law reviews.

For article discussing due process problems with Georgia’s post-judgment garnishment procedures, in light of City Fin. Co. v.Winston,

238 Ga. 10

,

231 S.E.2d 45

(1976), see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 144 (1977).

18-4-4.
Process of garnishment; period of garnishment.

All obligations owed by the garnishee to the defendant at the time of service of the summons of garnishment upon the garnishee and all obligations accruing from the garnishee to the defendant throughout the garnishment period shall be subject to the process of garnishment. No payment made by the garnishee to the defendant or on his or her behalf, or by any arrangement between the defendant and the garnishee, after the date of service of the summons of garnishment upon the garnishee shall defeat the lien of such garnishment.

All money or other property of the defendant in the possession or control of the garnishee at the time of service of the summons of garnishment upon the garnishee or coming into the possession or control of the garnishee throughout the garnishment period shall be subject to the process of garnishment, provided that, in the case of collateral securities in the hands of a creditor, such securities shall not be subject to garnishment so long as there is an amount owed, even if not then due, on the debt for which the securities were given as collateral.

The garnishment period shall begin on the day of service of the summons of garnishment and, for:

A continuing garnishment, shall include the next 1,095 days;

Garnishments, other than a continuing garnishment or continuing garnishment for support, served on a financial institution, shall include the next five days;

A continuing garnishment for support, shall remain for so long as the defendant is employed by the garnishee and shall not terminate until the original arrearage is retired; and

All other garnishments, shall include the next 29 days.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 4/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “, even if not then due,” near the end of subsection (b) and substituted “1,095 days” for “179 days” in paragraph (c)(1).

Law reviews.

For comment on Reeves v. Motor Contract Co., 324 F. Supp. 1011 (N.D. Ga. 1971), see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 369 (1972).

18-4-5.
Maximum part of disposable earnings subject to garnishment; adverse employment action prohibited.

For purposes of this subsection, a “private student loan” shall be defined as an educational or student loan for postsecondary educational expenses but not a loan guaranteed under 20 U.S.C. Section 1070, et seq.

Subject to the limitations set forth in Code Sections 18-4-6 and 18-4-53, the maximum part of disposable earnings for any work week which is subject to garnishment shall not exceed the lesser of:

Twenty-five percent of the defendant’s disposable earnings for that week or, if the judgment upon which the garnishment is based arose from a private student loan, then 15 percent of the defendant’s disposable earnings for that week; or

The amount by which the defendant’s disposable earnings for that week exceed $217.50.

In case of earnings for a period other than a week, the proportionate fraction or multiple of 30 hours per week at $7.25 per hour shall be used.

A garnishee in a garnishment action in which the defendant is not an employee of such garnishee subject to federal and state income tax withholding by said garnishee shall be considered to have no knowledge of, nor any obligation to determine, the disposable earnings for such defendant and may, without liability to any party or nonparty, answer the summons without regard for any potential exemptions based on disposable earnings until such garnishee is served with, or consents to, a court order or a filed modification form as described in subsection (d) of this Code section in the pending garnishment action containing an alternative and enabling basis for determining the amount subject to garnishment.

A garnishee shall only be deemed to have knowledge that the judgment upon which a garnishment is based arose from a private student loan, and shall only be responsible to adjust any calculation of the amount subject to garnishment accordingly, if the summons of garnishment served by the plaintiff on such garnishee states such information conspicuously on its face or upon service on such garnishee of a court order in the pending garnishment action stating such information.

The limitation on garnishment set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply although the garnishee may receive a summons of garnishment in more than one garnishment case naming the same defendant unless the garnishee has received a summons of continuing garnishment for support as provided in Article 3 of this chapter.

No employer shall discharge an employee by reason of the fact that such employee’s earnings have been subjected to garnishment for any one obligation, even though more than one summons of garnishment may be served upon such employer with respect to the obligation.

The amount to be paid by the garnishee in a continuing garnishment may be voluntarily modified to a lesser amount if the plaintiff and the defendant execute the form provided in Code Section 18-4-90. The form shall be effective only upon:

Filing the fully executed and attested form or a copy thereof in the garnishment court; and

Serving the filed form upon the garnishee as provided in Code Section 9-11-4, or, when the garnishment is filed in a magistrate court, by serving the garnishee by using the constable of the magistrate court in the manner set forth in Code Section 9-11-4, or obtaining a written acknowledgment of receipt of service of the form by the garnishee, which may be by, but is not limited to, electronic mail, if the responding representative of the garnishee confirms authority to make such acknowledgment or is an officer or attorney of the garnishee.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2018, p. 820, § 2/SB 194; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 5/SB 443.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted “$217.50” for “$217.00” in subparagraph (a)(1)(B); and substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “In case of earnings for a period other than a week, a multiple of $7.25 per hour shall be used.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added paragraph (a)(1); redesignated former subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(2); added “or, if the judgment upon which the garnishment is based arose from a private student loan, then 15 percent of the defendant’s disposable earnings for that week” in subparagraph (a)(2)(A); redesignated former paragraph (a)(2) as present paragraph (a)(3); added paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5); and added subsection (d).

18-4-6.
Exemption from garnishment.

Certain earnings or property of the defendant may be exempt from the process of garnishment.

Funds or benefits from an individual retirement account or from a pension or retirement program shall be exempt from the process of garnishment until paid or otherwise distributed to a member of such program or beneficiary thereof. Such funds or benefits, when paid or otherwise distributed to such member or beneficiary, shall be exempt from the process of garnishment only to the extent of the limitations provided in Code Section 18-4-5 for other disposable earnings, unless a greater exemption is otherwise provided by law.

Funds in an unfunded plan maintained by an employer primarily for the purpose of providing deferred compensation for a select group of management or highly compensated employees shall not be exempt from the process of garnishment.

Exempt property shall not be considered disposable earnings for purposes of Code Section 18-4-5 or subsection (b) of Code Section 18-4-53.

Not later than May 22, 2016, the Attorney General shall create and maintain on the Department of Law’s website a list of exemptions that a defendant may be allowed by law to claim in relation to a garnishment of his or her earnings or property. The Attorney General shall revise such list when exemptions are repealed, revised, or created by law. The Attorney General shall transmit a copy of such list to each clerk of court in this state who issues summonses of garnishment and transmit a revised list when a change is made to such list.

Each clerk of court in this state who issues summonses of garnishment shall post and update such list of exemptions as promulgated by the Attorney General and shall provide such list to individuals upon request.

A defendant may claim an exemption as provided in Code Section 18-4-15.

The fact that an exemption is not identified by the Attorney General shall not preclude a defendant from claiming an exemption.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, “May 22, 2016” was substituted for “ten days after the effective date of this Code section” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For note reviewing Georgia’s new garnishment procedures, see 17 Ga. St. B.J. 140 (1981).

For article, “Retirement Benefits: Protection from Creditors’ Claims,” see 24 Ga. St. B.J. 118 (1988).

For note on 1990 amendment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 265 (1990).

18-4-7.
Required information on summons of garnishment or attachment thereto; form usage; failure to use correct form.

The amount shown on the summons of garnishment shall not exceed the amount the defendant owes the plaintiff pursuant to a judgment.

A summons of garnishment, or an attachment thereto, shall state on its face with particularity all of the following information, to the extent reasonably available to the plaintiff:

The name of the defendant and, to the extent such would reasonably enable the garnishee to properly respond to the summons of garnishment, all known configurations, nicknames, aliases, former or maiden names, trade names, or variations thereof;

The service address and the current address of the defendant and, to the extent such would reasonably enable the garnishee to properly respond to the summons of garnishment and such is reasonably available to the plaintiff, the past addresses of the defendant; and

The social security number or federal tax identification number of the defendant; provided, however, that if such summons is filed with a court, the court filing shall be redacted in accordance with Code Section 9-11-7.1 or 15-10-54, as applicable. The defendant’s full social security number or federal tax identification number shall be made known to the garnishee and defendant in accordance with Code Section 9-11-7.1 or 15-10-54, as applicable, to the extent such information is reasonably available to the plaintiff.

The form for a summons of garnishment on a financial institution shall not be used for a continuing garnishment or continuing garnishment for support. A summons of garnishment on a financial institution, or an attachment thereto, shall also state with particularity the defendant’s account, identification, or tracking numbers known to the plaintiff used by the garnishee in the identification or administration of the defendant’s funds or property; provided, however, that if such summons is filed with a court, the court filing shall be redacted in accordance with Code Section 9-11-7.1 or 15-10-54, as applicable. The defendant’s account, identification, or tracking numbers shall be made known to the garnishee and defendant in accordance with Code Section 9-11-7.1 or 15-10-54, as applicable, to the extent such information is known to the plaintiff.

A misspelling of any information required by this subsection, other than the surname of a natural person defendant, shall not invalidate a summons of garnishment, so long as such information is not misleading in a search of the garnishee’s records.

The form for a summons of garnishment is set forth in Code Section 18-4-74, and the optional attachment thereto is set forth in Code Section 18-4-75. The form for a summons of garnishment on a financial institution is set forth in Code Section 18-4-76, and the attachment thereto is set forth in Code Section 18-4-77. The form for a summons of garnishment on a financial institution shall not be used for a continuing garnishment or continuing garnishment for support.

When a plaintiff uses the incorrect form for a summons of garnishment of any type, the garnishment shall not be valid and the garnishee shall be relieved of all liability.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2018, p. 820, § 3/SB 194.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted “The form for a” for “A” at the beginning of the first sentence of paragraph (b)(2).

18-4-8.
Required documents and service thereof.

The plaintiff shall serve the garnishee, as provided in Code Section 9-11-4, or, when the garnishment is filed in a magistrate court, the plaintiff may serve the garnishee by using the constable of the magistrate court in the manner set forth in Code Section 9-11-4, with a copy of the affidavit of garnishment, summons of garnishment, Notice to Defendant of Right Against Garnishment of Money, Including Wages, and Other Property, and Defendant’s Claim Form. The plaintiff shall fill in the style of the case, except for the civil action file number, and the garnishment court information on such notice and claim form. Such notice and claim form are set forth in Code Section 18-4-82.

At any time after filing of an affidavit of garnishment but not more than three business days after service of the summons of garnishment on the garnishee, the plaintiff shall cause a copy of the affidavit of garnishment, a copy of the summons of garnishment, a copy of the Notice to Defendant of Right Against Garnishment of Money, Including Wages, and Other Property, and a copy of the Defendant’s Claim Form as described in subsection (a) of this Code section, using one of the following methods:

To be sent to the defendant at the defendant’s last known address by:

Regular mail; and

Registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

A certificate of service or any other proof of the sending of the above documents to the defendant, which may include but is not limited to copies of the envelope bearing the official notification from the United States Postal Service of the attempted or actual delivery of such registered or certified mail, the envelope bearing the official notification from a commercial firm of the attempted or actual delivery of such statutory overnight delivery, or a written notice from the United States Postal Service or a commercial firm, including but not limited to printings or reproductions from the website of the United States Postal Service or such commercial firm, of the attempted or actual delivery of such registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the garnishment is pending.

The defendant’s actual timely notice of the garnishment or the defendant’s refusal to accept or failure to claim such registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery addressed to such defendant shall satisfy all other requirements for service of notice in this Code section;

To be delivered personally to the defendant by:

An individual who is not a party and is not younger than 18 years of age;

An individual who has been appointed by the court to serve process or is a permanent process server;

The sheriff of the county where the action is brought or where the defendant is found or by such sheriff’s deputy;

The marshal or sheriff of the court or by such official’s deputy;

The constable of the magistrate court, when the garnishment is filed in a magistrate court, or by the constable’s deputy; or

A certified process server as provided in Code Section 9-11-4.1.

A certification by the person making the delivery shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the garnishment is pending; or

When the plaintiff, or plaintiff’s attorney, states under oath that the defendant resides out of this state, has departed this state, or after due diligence cannot be found within this state, or has concealed his or her place of residence from the plaintiff, to be sent to the defendant by regular mail at the address at which the defendant:

Accepted service in the action resulting in the judgment;

Identified as his or her residence in any pleading in the action resulting in the judgment; or

Was served as shown on the return of service in the action resulting in the judgment.

A certificate of such mailing shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the garnishment is pending by the person mailing such notice.

The methods of notification specified in this subsection shall be cumulative and may be used in any sequence or combination. When it appears that a plaintiff has reasonably, diligently, and in good faith attempted to use one method, another method thereafter may be utilized; for the time during which the attempt was being made, the time limit shall be tolled for the subsequent method.

No money or other property paid or delivered to the court by the garnishee shall be distributed nor shall any judgment be rendered against the garnishee until:

Ten days have elapsed from the date of filing a certificate of compliance with at least one method of notification provided by this subsection; and

If a garnishee answer was filed:

Twenty days have elapsed from the filing of the garnishee’s answer without a claim having been filed by any defendant or third party and without a traverse having been filed by the plaintiff; or

All traverses filed prior to the twenty-first day from the filing of the garnishee’s answer have been adjudicated and all claims have been adjudicated.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2018, p. 820, § 4/SB 194; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 6/SB 443.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted the present provisions of subparagraph (b)(1)(C) for the former provisions, which read: “To be sent to the defendant by regular mail at the address at which the defendant was served as shown on the return of service in the action resulting in the judgment when it shall appear by affidavit to the satisfaction of the clerk of the court that the defendant resides out of this state, has departed this state, cannot, after due diligence, be found within this state, or has concealed his or her place of residence from the plaintiff. A certificate of such mailing shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the garnishment is pending by the person mailing such notice.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “At any time after filing of an affidavit of garnishment but not” for “Not” at the beginning of paragraph (b)(1); deleted “, return receipt requested” following “delivery” at the end of subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i)(II); rewrote division (b)(1)(A)(ii), which read: “The return receipt indicating receipt by the defendant, the envelope bearing the official notification from the United States Postal Service of the defendant’s refusal to accept delivery of such registered or certified mail, the envelope bearing the official notification from a commercial firm of the defendant’s refusal to accept such statutory overnight delivery, or an official written notice from the United States Postal Service of the defendant’s refusal to accept delivery of such registered or certified mail shall be filed with the clerk of the court in which the garnishment is pending..”; in division (b)(1)(A)(iii), substituted “The defendant’s actual timely notice of the garnishment or the” for “The” and “satisfy all other requirements for service of notice in this Code section” for “be deemed notice of such defendant”; substituted “When the plaintiff, or plaintiff’s attorney, states under oath that the defendant resides out of this state, has departed this state, or after due diligence cannot be found within this state, or has concealed his or her place of residence from the plaintiff, to” for “To” in division (b)(1)(C)(i); deleted “when it shall appear by affidavit that the defendant resides out of this state; has departed this state; cannot, after due diligence, be found within this state; or has concealed his or her place of residence from the plaintiff” following “judgment” at the end of subdivision (b)(1)(C)(i)(III); and inserted “filing a certificate of” in subparagraph (b)(3)(A).

18-4-9.
Periodic summonses; original filing date limiting extension.

Summonses of garnishment may issue from time to time until the judgment is paid or the garnishment proceeding is otherwise terminated.

Except in a continuing garnishment or continuing garnishment for support, no new summons of garnishment on the same affidavit of garnishment shall be issued after two years from the date of the original filing of such affidavit. After two years from such original filing date and provided that no unadjudicated claims, traverses, appeals, motions, or other pleadings remain before the court, the garnishment proceeding, other than a continuing garnishment or continuing garnishment for support, based on such affidavit shall automatically stand dismissed unless there are funds remaining in the registry of the court or a new summons of garnishment has been issued in the preceding 30 days. In the event funds remain in the registry at such time and the plaintiff has filed its certificate of compliance pursuant to subparagraph (b)(3)(A) of Code Section 18-4-8 and has made its application for disbursement, all such funds will be deemed abandoned by the defendant and disbursed to the plaintiff, notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2018, p. 820, § 5/SB 194; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 7/SB 443.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, substituted “After two years, the” for “The” at the beginning of the second sentence of subsection (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (b), which read: “No new summons of garnishment on the same affidavit of garnishment shall be issued after two years from the date of the original filing of such affidavit. After two years, the garnishment proceeding based on such affidavit shall automatically stand dismissed unless there are funds remaining in the registry of the court or a new summons of garnishment has been issued in the preceding 30 days.”

18-4-10.
Responses by garnishee; judgment by default.

The summons of garnishment shall state that if the garnishee fails to file a garnishee’s answer to such summons in a timely manner, a judgment by default shall be entered against the garnishee for the amount remaining due on a judgment as shown in the plaintiff’s affidavit of garnishment.

The summons of garnishment shall be directed to the garnishee, commanding the garnishee to respond and state what money or other property is subject to garnishment. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section and Articles 2 and 3 of this chapter, the garnishee’s answer shall be filed with the court issuing the summons not sooner than 30 days and not later than 45 days after service of the summons, and the money or other property subject to garnishment shall be sent to or delivered to the court concurrently with the sending or filing of such garnishee’s answer.

When the garnishee is a financial institution and the garnishment is not a continuing garnishment or continuing garnishment for support, such garnishee’s answer shall be filed with the court issuing the summons of garnishment not sooner than five days and not later than 15 days after the date of service of the summons, and the money or other property subject to garnishment shall be paid to or delivered to the court concurrently with such garnishee’s answer. If the defendant does not have an active account with and is not the owner of any money or other property in the possession of such financial institution, then the garnishee may immediately file the garnishee’s answer; provided, however, that such garnishee’s answer shall be filed not later than 15 days after the date of service of the summons.

When the garnishee is a financial institution and the garnishment is pursuant to Article 2 or 3 of this chapter, any accounts of the defendant shall be subject to the process of garnishment only for the garnishment period described in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 18-4-4, and any funds due to be paid to the garnishment court through such garnishment period may be held and delivered with the first garnishee answer pursuant to Code Section 18-4-42.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 8/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the last sentence of subsection (b), substituted “sent” for “paid” and inserted “the sending or filing of”; and added subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article discussing due process problems with Georgia’s post-judgment garnishment procedures, in light of
City Fin. Co. v. Winston,

238 Ga. 10

,

231 S.E.2d 45

(1979), see
13 Ga. St. B.J. 144 (1977).

For article discussing an advisory opinion issued by the Standing Committee on the Unlicensed Practice of Law on the issue of execution and filing of an answer in the garnishment action by a nonattorney employee of the garnishee, see 16 (No. 1) Ga. St. B.J. 102 (2010).

18-4-11.
Garnishee answer; property located in area with restricted access; physical filings allowed.

Within the time prescribed by Code Section 18-4-10, the garnishee shall file a garnishee answer. Concurrently with the garnishee’s answer, the garnishee shall send or deliver to the court the money or other property admitted in the garnishee’s answer to be subject to garnishment except, when the conditions of subsection (d) of Code Section 18-4-5 have been satisfied, the specified amounts of money in each answer shall, instead, be paid directly to the plaintiff.

If in responding to the summons of garnishment the garnishee shall state that the property of the defendant includes property in a safe-deposit box or similar property, the garnishee shall respond to the court issuing the summons of garnishment as to the existence of such safe-deposit box and shall restrict access to any contents of such safe-deposit box until the earlier of:

Further order of such court regarding the disposition of the contents of such safe-deposit box; or

The elapsing of 120 days from the date of filing of the garnishee answer unless such time has been extended by the court.

If the garnishee has been served with a summons in more than one garnishment case involving the same defendant, the garnishee shall state in each garnishee answer that the money or other property is being paid or delivered to a specifically named court subject to the demands of other cases and shall give the numbers of all such cases in each garnishee answer.

If the garnishee is unable to respond with the specific information required by this Code section, the garnishee’s inability shall be stated in the garnishee’s answer, together with all the facts plainly, fully, and distinctly set forth, so as to enable the court to give judgment thereon.

The form for a garnishee answer is set forth in Code Section 18-4-84, and the form for a financial institution garnishee answer is set forth in Code Section 18-4-85.

A garnishee may elect to file, and a court shall not reject, a physical answer or answers of garnishment even in courts otherwise subject to electronic filing requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 9/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “Within the time prescribed by Code Section 18-4-10, the garnishee shall file a garnishee answer. Along with the garnishee’s answer, the garnishee shall pay or deliver to the court the money or other property admitted in the garnishee’s answer to be subject to garnishment.” and added subsection (f).

18-4-12.
Entity as garnishee.

When a garnishment proceeding is filed in a court under any provision of this chapter involving an entity as garnishee, the execution and filing of a garnishee answer may be done by an entity’s authorized officer, employee, or any individual or entity engaged by such garnishee for the purpose of processing payrolls or accounts payable and shall not constitute the practice of law. If a claim or traverse is filed to such entity’s garnishee answer in a court of record, an attorney shall be required to represent such entity in further garnishment proceedings.

An entity’s payment into court of any money or other property of the defendant, or money or other property which is admitted to be subject to garnishment, may be done by an entity’s authorized officer, employee, or any individual or entity engaged by such garnishee for the purpose of processing payrolls or accounts payable and shall not constitute the practice of law.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255; Ga. L. 2020, p. 691, § 10/SB 443.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “employee, or any individual or entity engaged by such garnishee for the purpose of processing payrolls or accounts payable” in subsections (a) and (b).

Law reviews.

For article discussing an advisory opinion issued by the Standing Committee on the Unlicensed Practice of Law on the issue of execution and filing of an answer in the garnishment action by a nonattorney employee of the garnishee, see 16 (No. 1) Ga. St. B.J. 102 (2010).

18-4-13.
Service of garnishee’s answer.

All garnishee answers shall, concurrently with filing, be served by the garnishee upon the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney and the defendant or the defendant’s attorney.

Service of the garnishee’s answer upon the plaintiff shall be shown by the:

Written acknowledgment of the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney; or

Certificate of the garnishee or the garnishee’s attorney, attached to the garnishee’s answer, that a copy of the garnishee’s answer was mailed to the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney.

No service upon the plaintiff shall be required unless the name and address of the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney shall legibly appear on the face of the summons of garnishment.

If the garnishee fails to serve the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be allowed 20 days from the time the plaintiff receives actual notice of the garnishee’s answer to traverse the garnishee’s answer.

Service of the garnishee’s answer upon the defendant shall be shown by the:

Written acknowledgment of the defendant or the defendant’s attorney; or

Certificate of the garnishee or the garnishee’s attorney, attached to the garnishee’s answer, that a copy of the garnishee’s answer was mailed to the:

Defendant’s attorney; or

Defendant at the last address known to the garnishee.

No service upon the defendant shall be required by a financial institution garnishee if the defendant does not have an active account with and is not the owner of any money or other property in the possession of such financial institution.

The garnishee shall provide the defendant, by regular mail at the defendant’s last address known to the garnishee, with the Notice to Defendant of Right Against Garnishment of Money, Including Wages, and Other Property and the Defendant’s Claim Form that it received from the plaintiff as set forth in subsection (a) of Code Section 18-4-8.

History.

Code 1981, §

18-4-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 8, § 1/SB 255.